New Jersey, session 222, S2904.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Director of the Division of Consumer Affairs shall establish and undertake a public information campaign to educate and inform consumers concerning real estate rental housing scams. The campaign shall include information about recognizing and reporting a rental scam. The public information campaign shall include, but not be limited to, the preparation, publication, and distribution of information through the divisions Internet website, booklets, pamphlets, or other pertinent materials.  The information shall be made available in English and Spanish. The director shall also provide a toll-free telephone number for consumers to obtain additional information or make an inquiry regarding a prospective rental, landlord, or real estate agent or agency. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month after the date of enactment, except the director may take anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.